Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 17 Fuel Tax

Law reviews. —

For article, “Practitioner's Guide to Valuation and Assessment Appeals of State and Local Assessed Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 173 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

71 Am. Jur. 2d State and Local Taxation §§ 550 to 564.

Oil and gas farmout agreements, 65 ALR5th 211.

47B C.J.S. Internal Revenue § 604.